Vermont, session 2025-2026, H365.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
(a) Purpose. The purpose of this act is to:
(1) enhance the authority of the Attorney General to regulate providers
of social media platforms and artificial intelligence systems; and
(2) protect the health and safety of Vermonters by requiring providers of
social media platforms and artificial intelligence systems to:
(A) annually register with the Secretary of State; and
VT LEG #379195 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.365
2025 Page 2 of 10
(B) agree to product safety and privacy terms.
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. chapter 118 is added to read:
CHAPTER 118. SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS
§ 4193a. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Consumer” means an individual who is a resident of the State and
who uses a provider’s social media platform.
(2) “Dark pattern” means a user interface designed or manipulated with
the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision-
making, or choice and includes any practice the Federal Trade Commission
refers to as a “dark pattern.”
(3) “Personal identifying information” means any information, including
sensitive information, that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or
identifiable consumer. The term does not include deidentified information or
publicly available information of a consumer.
(4) “Provider of a social media platform” and “provider” means a person
that operates a social media platform that is used by consumers.
(5) “Social media platform” means a website, mobile application, or
internet medium that:
VT LEG #379195 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.365
2025 Page 3 of 10
(A) permits a person to become a registered user, establish an
account, or create a profile for the purpose of allowing users to create, share,
and view user-generated content through such an account or profile;
(B) enables one or more users to generate content that can be viewed
by other users of the medium; and
(C) primarily serves as a medium for users to interact with content
generated by other users of the medium.
§ 4193b. ANNUAL REGISTRATION
(a) Annually, on or before January 31 following a year in which a person
meets the definition of a provider of a social media platform as defined in
section 4193a of this chapter, a person shall:
(1) register with the Secretary of State;
(2) pay a registration fee of $100.00;
(3) provide the following information during registration:
(A) the name and primary physical, email, and internet addresses of
the person; and
(B) the most recent version of the privacy policy and terms and
conditions in use by the social media platform; and
(4) agree to the product safety and privacy terms as set forth in section
4193c of this chapter and by those set by the Attorney General through the
Attorney General’s rulemaking authority pursuant to this chapter.
VT LEG #379195 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.365
2025 Page 4 of 10
(b) A provider that fails to register and provide all required information
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section:
(1) is liable to the State for:
(A) a civil penalty of $50.00 for each day, not to exceed a total of
$10,000.00 for each year, it fails to register pursuant to this section;
(B) an amount equal to the fees due under this section during the
period it failed to register pursuant to this section; and
(C) other penalties imposed by law; and
(2) does not otherwise limit the provider’s responsibility to comply with
the provisions required of providers set forth in this chapter.
(c) The Attorney General may maintain an action in the Civil Division of
the Superior Court to collect the penalties imposed in this section and to seek
appropriate injunctive relief.
§ 4193c. PRODUCT SAFETY AND PRIVACY FOR MINORS
(a) A provider of a social media platform who knows, or by the exercise of
reasonable care should have known, that a consumer is a minor shall:
(1) Not use any design feature on a social media platform that the
provider knew, or by the exercise of reasonable care should have known, is
harmful to minors, including the encouragement of excessive or compulsive
use of a social media platform by a minor.
VT LEG #379195 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.365
2025 Page 5 of 10
(2) Configure all default privacy settings for minors to a high level of
privacy.
(3) Not permit, by default, an unknown adult to contact a minor on its
platform without the minor first initiating that contact.
(4) Not, in its operation, discriminate against a minor based upon the
minor’s race, ethnicity, sex, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity,
gender expression, or national origin.
(5) Not use dark patterns.
(6) Use reasonable care to avoid any heightened risk of harm to a minor
caused by processing of personal data in the course of providing the social
media platform to minors.
(A) As used in this subdivision (6), “heightened risk of harm to a
minor” means processing the personal data of a minor in a manner that
presents a reasonably foreseeable risk of:
(i) unfair or deceptive treatment of, or unlawful disparate impact
on, a minor;
(ii) financial, physical, or reputational injury to a minor;
(iii) unintended disclosure of the personal data of a minor; or
(iv) any physical or other intrusion upon the solitude or seclusion,
or the private affairs or concerns, of a minor if the intrusion would be offensive
to a reasonable person.
VT LEG #379195 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.365
2025 Page 6 of 10
(7) Limit the use of a minor’s personal identifying information to the
purpose for which the information was collected.
(8) Not process the personal data of a minor for the purposes of targeted
advertising or sell the personal data of a minor.
(b) Any intentional violation of this section by a provider of a social media
platform shall be considered be an unfair or deceptive act or practice in
commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
§ 4193d. RULES
In addition to the rules otherwise required by this chapter, the Attorney
General may adopt any other rule the Attorney General deems necessary to
implement the purpose and policies of this chapter.
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. chapter 119 is added to read:
CHAPTER 119. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
§ 4194a. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Algorithmic discrimination” means any condition in which the use
of an artificial intelligence system results in an unlawful differential treatment
or impact that disfavors an individual on the basis of the individual’s actual or
perceived age, color, disability, ethnicity, genetic information, limited
proficiency in the English language, national origin, race, religion,
reproductive health, sex, veteran status, or other classification protected under
VT LEG #379195 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.365
2025 Page 7 of 10
the laws of this State or federal law.
(2) “Artificial intelligence system” and “system” means any machine-
based system that, for any explicit or implicit objective, infers from the inputs
the system receives how to generate outputs, including content, decisions,
predictions, or recommendations, that can influence physical or virtual
environments.
(3) “Consumer” means an individual who is a resident of the State and
who uses a provider’s artificial intelligence system.
(4) “Provider of an artificial intelligence system” and “provider” means
a person that operates an artificial intelligence system that is used by
consumers.
§ 4194b. ANNUAL REGISTRATION
(a) Annually, on or before January 31 following a year in which a person
meets the definition of a provider of an artificial intelligence system as defined
in section 4194a of this chapter, a person shall:
(1) register with the Secretary of State;
(2) pay a registration fee of $100.00; and
(3) provide the following information:
(A) the name and primary physical, email, and internet addresses of
the person;
VT LEG #379195 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.365
2025 Page 8 of 10
(B) the most recent version of the privacy policy and terms and
conditions in use by the artificial intelligence system; and
(C) the data collection, storage, and security practices of the artificial
intelligence system;
(4) provide a description of the artificial intelligence model, including
its capacity, training data, intended use, design process and methodologies; and
(5) agree to the product safety and privacy terms as set forth in section
4194c of this chapter and by those set by the Attorney General through the
Attorney General’s rulemaking authority pursuant to this chapter.
(b) A provider that fails to register and provide all required information
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section:
(1) is liable to the State for:
(A) a civil penalty of $50.00 for each day, not to exceed a total of
$10,000.00 for each year, it fails to register pursuant to this section;
(B) an amount equal to the fees due under this section during the
period it failed to register pursuant to this section; and
(C) other penalties imposed by law; and
(2) does not otherwise limit the provider’s responsibility to comply with
the provisions required of providers set forth in this chapter.
VT LEG #379195 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.365
2025 Page 9 of 10
(c) The Attorney General may maintain an action in the Civil Division of
the Superior Court to collect the penalties imposed in this section and to seek
appropriate injunctive relief.
§ 4194c. PRODUCT SAFETY AND PRIVACY
(a) The provider of an artificial intelligence system shall:
(1) exercise reasonable care to protect consumers from any known or
foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination arising from the intended and
contracted uses of the system;
(2) clearly and conspicuously disclose to a consumer using an artificial
intelligence system that the consumer is interacting with an artificial
intelligence system;
(3) obtain informed consent from a consumer before collecting or using
a consumer’s data;
(4) obtain, separate from the informed consent set forth in subdivision
(3) of this subsection, informed consent from a consumer before sharing or
selling a consumer’s data; and
(5) implement reasonable security measures to protect the data of a
consumer used to train the model.
(b) Any intentional violation of this section by a provider of an artificial
intelligence system shall be considered be an unfair or deceptive act or practice
in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
VT LEG #379195 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.365
2025 Page 10 of 10
§ 4194d. RULES
In addition to the rules otherwise required by this chapter, the Attorney
General may adopt any other rule the Attorney General deems necessary to
implement the purpose and policies of this chapter.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379195 v.1